Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB806.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "backyard chicken":
(a) Means a domesticated hen kept on residential property for personal egg
production and educational purposes, excluding commercial farming; and
(b) Shall not mean a domesticated rooster.
(2) A city, urban-county government, charter county government, consolidated local
government, or unified local government shall not enact or enforce any
ordinance, zoning regulation, or policy that directly or indirectly prohibits a
person from keeping six (6) or fewer backyard chickens on any residential
property.
(3) A city, urban-county government, charter county government, consolidated local
government, and unified local government may enact and enforce reasonable
ordinances regulations, or policies to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of
residents, including but not limited to:
(a) Setback requirements for coops holding backyard chickens from property
lines and neighboring residences;
(b) Sanitation and maintenance standards to control odors and pests; and
(c) Prohibiting the commercial sale of eggs or backyard chickens on residential
properties.
(4) Any ordinance, regulation, or policy that conflicts with this section shall be void
and unenforceable.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/19/2025 2:28 PM Jacketed